Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB319.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706(e) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(e) Military personnel hunting licenses.--Resident military personnel hunting licenses shall be issued by the commission, county treasurer or issuing agent to persons who satisfy all of the following requirements:(1) Are residents of this Commonwealth.(2) Are on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces.[(3) Are assigned to a facility outside this Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 (4) Are on temporary leave in this Commonwealth.]Such persons shall comply with the regulations of the commission.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0319PN0276 - 2 - 12345